Georgia statutes. 
Mandamus. - Based on the Georgia legislature's explicitly stated intention in the Georgia Local Government Public Works Construction Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-1 et seq., that local laws and ordinances controlled the manner of the city's execution of and entry into contracts, a contractor was not entitled to a writ of mandamus requiring the city to execute a contract in the city's favor, as neither the mayor nor the city council exercised their discretionary authority to approve any award that might or might not have resulted from the competitive sealed proposals process. Duty Free Air & Ship Supply Co./Franklin Wilson Airport Concession, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 282 Ga. 173, 646 S.E.2d 48 (2007).

36-91-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Alternate bids" means the amount stated in the bid or proposal to be added to or deducted from the amount of the base bid or base proposal if the corresponding change in project scope or alternate materials or methods of construction is accepted.

(2) "Base bid" or "base proposal" means the amount of money stated in the bid or proposal as the sum for which the bidder or proposer offers to perform the work.

(3) "Bid bond" means a bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties for the faithful acceptance of the contract payable to, in favor of, and for the protection of the governmental entity for which the contract is to be awarded.

(4) "Change order" means an alteration, addition, or deduction from the original scope of work as defined by the contract documents to address changes or unforeseen conditions necessary for project completion.

(5) "Competitive sealed bidding" means a method of soliciting public works construction contracts whereby the award is based upon the lowest responsive, responsible bid in conformance with the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-91-21.

(6) "Competitive sealed proposals" means a method of soliciting public works contracts whereby the award is based upon criteria identified in a request for proposals in conformance with the provisions of subsection (c) of Code Section 36-91-21.

(7) "Emergency" means any situation resulting in imminent danger to the public health or safety or the loss of an essential governmental service.

(8) "Governing authority" means the official or group of officials responsible for governance of a governmental entity.

(9) "Governmental entity" means a county, municipal corporation, consolidated government, authority, board of education, or other public board, body, or commission but shall not include any authority, board, department, or commission of the state, or a public transportation agency as defined by Chapter 9 of Title 32.

(10) "Payment bond" means a bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties payable to the governmental entity for which the work is to be done and intended for the use and protection of all subcontractors and all persons supplying labor, materials, machinery, and equipment in the prosecution of the work provided for in the public works construction contract.

(11) "Performance bond" means a bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties for the faithful performance of the contract and to indemnify the governmental entity for any damages occasioned by a failure to perform the same within the prescribed time. Such bond shall be payable to, in favor of, and for the protection of the governmental entity for which the work is to be done.

(12) "Public works construction" means the building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing of any public structure or building or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property other than those projects covered by Chapter 4 of Title 32 or by Chapter 37 of Title 50. Such term does not include the routine operation, repair, or maintenance of existing structures, buildings, or real property, or any energy savings performance contract or any improvements or installations performed as part of an energy savings performance contract.

(13) "Responsible bidder" or "responsible offeror" means a person or entity that has the capability in all respects to perform fully and reliably the contract requirements.

(14) "Responsive bidder" or "responsive offeror" means a person or entity that has submitted a bid or proposal that conforms in all material respects to the requirements set forth in the invitation for bids or request for proposals.

(15) "Scope of project" means the work required by the original contract documents and any subsequent change orders required or appropriate to accomplish the intent of the project as described in the bid documents.

(16) "Scope of work" means the work that is required by the contract documents.

(17) "Sole source" means those procurements made pursuant to a written determination by a governing authority that there is only one source for the required supply, service, or construction item.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-91-2, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 640, § 1/SB 146; Ga. L. 2012, p. 59, § 1/SB 113.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Public works construction. - Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia was immune from a suit by employees of a contractor who provided a forged payment bond to the Board; the maintenance contract was not for "public works construction" as defined in O.C.G.A. § 36-91-2(12); therefore, the provisions for payment bonds in O.C.G.A. § 13-10-60 et seq. did not apply. Further, the Board had no duty to investigate the information presented on the face of the payment bond. Bd. of Regents of the Univ. Sys. of Ga. v. Brooks, 324 Ga. App. 15, 749 S.E.2d 23 (2013).

Emergency sufficiently identified. - City was not required to obtain a payment bond in compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-91-90 because the requirement did not apply to emergency projects, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-22(e); the city's description in its minutes of the "emergency replacement of a 10-inch sanitary sewer main on Embassy Drive" was sufficient to describe the nature of the emergency. City of College Park v. Sekisui SPR Ams., LLC, 331 Ga. App. 404, 771 S.E.2d 101 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1141, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 471 (Ga. 2015).

——————————

ARTICLE 2

CONTRACTING AND BIDDING REQUIREMENTS

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - School facilities and capital outlay management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, Chapter 160-5-4.

36-91-20. Written contract required; advertising; competitive sealed bidding; timing of addendums; prequalification.

Statute text

(a) All public works construction contracts subject to this chapter entered into by a governmental entity with private persons or entities shall be in writing and on file and available for public inspection at a place designated by such governmental entity. Municipalities and consolidated governments shall execute and enter into contracts in the manner provided in applicable local legislation or by ordinance.

(b) (1) Prior to entering into a public works construction contract other than those exempted by Code Section 36-91-22, a governmental entity shall publicly advertise the contract opportunity. Such notice shall be posted conspicuously in the governing authority's office and shall be advertised on the Georgia Procurement Registry as provided for in Code Section 50-5-69 at no cost to the governmental entity. Such advertisement on such registry shall be for the same period of time specified under paragraph (3) of this subsection. Such notice may be advertised in the legal organ of the county or by electronic means on the website of the governmental entity or any other appropriate websites identified by the governmental entity.

(2) Contract opportunities that are advertised in the legal organ shall be advertised a minimum of two times, with the first advertisement occurring at least four weeks prior to the opening of the sealed bids or proposals. The second advertisement shall follow no earlier than two weeks from the first advertisement.

(3) Contract opportunities that are advertised solely on the Internet shall be posted continuously for at least four weeks prior to the opening of sealed bids or proposals. Inadvertent or unintentional loss of Internet service during the advertisement period shall not require the contract award or bid or proposal opening to be delayed.

(4) Contract opportunities that will be awarded by competitive sealed bids shall have plans and specifications available on the first day of the advertisement and shall be open to inspection by the public. The plans and specifications shall indicate if the project will be awarded by base bid or base bid plus selected alternates and:

(A) A statement listing whether all anticipated federal, state, or local permits required for the project have been obtained or an indication of the status of the application for each such permit including when it is expected to be obtained; and

(B) A statement listing whether all anticipated rights of way and easements required for the project have been obtained or an indication of the status as to when each such rights of way or easements are expected to be obtained.

(5) Contract opportunities that will be awarded by competitive sealed proposals shall be publicly advertised with a request for proposals which request shall include conceptual program information in the request for proposals describing the requested services in a level of detail appropriate to the project delivery method selected for the project.

(6) The advertisement shall include such details and specifications as will enable the public to know the extent and character of the work to be done.

(7) All required notices of advertisement shall also advise of any mandatory prequalification requirements or pre-bid conferences as well as any federal requirements pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 36-91-22. Any advertisement which provides notice of a mandatory pre-bid conference or prequalification shall provide reasonable advance notice of said conference or for the submittal of such prequalification information.

(c) Governmental entities are authorized to utilize any construction delivery method, provided that all public works construction contracts subject to the requirements of this chapter that:

(1) Place the bidder or offeror at risk for construction; and

(2) Require labor or building materials in the execution of the contract

shall be awarded on the basis of competitive sealed bidding or competitive sealed proposals. Governmental entities shall have the authority to reject all bids or proposals or any bid or proposal that is nonresponsive or not responsible and to waive technicalities and informalities.

(d) No governmental entity shall issue or cause to be issued any addenda modifying plans and specifications within a period of 72 hours prior to the advertised time for the opening bids or proposals, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. However, if the necessity arises to issue an addendum modifying plans and specifications within the 72 hour period prior to the advertised time for the opening of bids or proposals, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, then the opening of bids or proposals shall be extended at least 72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, from the date of the original bid or proposal opening without need to readvertise as required by subsection (b) of this Code section.

(e) Bid and contract documents may contain provisions authorizing the issuance of change orders, without the necessity of additional requests for bids or proposals, within the scope of the project when appropriate or necessary in the performance of the contract. Change orders may not be used to evade the purposes of this article.

(f) Any governmental entity may, in its discretion, adopt a process for mandatory prequalification of prospective bidders or offerors; provided, however, that:

(1) Criteria for prequalification must be reasonably related to the project or the quality of work;

(2) Criteria for prequalification must be available to any prospective bidder or offeror requesting such information for each project that requires prequalification;

(3) Any prequalification process must include a method of notifying prospective bidders or offerors of the criteria for or limitations to prequalification; and

(4) Any prequalification process must include a procedure for a disqualified bidder to respond to his or her disqualification to a representative of the governmental entity; provided, however, that such procedure shall not be construed to require the governmental entity to provide a formal appeals procedure. A prequalified bidder or offeror can not be later disqualified without cause.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 640, § 2/SB 146; Ga. L. 2018, p. 926, § 2/HB 489; Ga. L. 2019, p. 283, § 2/HB 322.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in paragraph (b)(1), in the second sentence, substituted "or any appropriate Internet websites identified by the governmental entity which shall" for "or an Internet website identified by the governmental entity which may" in the middle, and added ", provided that such posting is at no cost to the governmental entity" at the end.

The 2019 amendment, effective April 28, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (b)(1) for the former provisions, which read: "Prior to entering into a public works construction contract other than those exempted by Code Section 36-91-22, a governmental entity shall publicly advertise the contract opportunity. Such notice shall be posted conspicuously in the governing authority's office and shall be advertised in the legal organ of the county or by electronic means on an Internet website of the governmental entity or any appropriate Internet websites identified by the governmental entity which shall include the Georgia Procurement Registry as provided by Code Section 50-5-69, provided that such posting is at no cost to the governmental entity."

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

School board acted within the board's authority. - Trial court properly relied solely on the court's determination that an unsuccessful bidding contractor would be unlikely to prevail on the merits of the contractor's suit in denying the contractor's petition for an interlocutory injunction and vacation of the court's temporary restraining order as: (1) the school board acted within the board's powers in accepting, albeit late, the lowest bidder's list of subcontractors; and (2) the board was authorized to find that the bid provision requiring that a list of subcontractors be provided with a bid was immaterial and could be waived. R. D. Brown Contrs., Inc. v. Bd. of Educ. of Columbia County, 280 Ga. 210, 626 S.E.2d 471 (2006).

Mandamus. - Based on the Georgia legislature's explicitly stated intention in the Georgia Local Government Public Works Construction Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-1 et seq., that local laws and ordinances controlled the manner of the city's execution of and entry into contracts, a contractor was not entitled to a writ of mandamus requiring the city to execute a contract in the city's favor, as neither the mayor nor the city council exercised their discretionary authority to approve any award that might or might not have resulted from the competitive sealed proposals process. Duty Free Air & Ship Supply Co./Franklin Wilson Airport Concession, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 282 Ga. 173, 646 S.E.2d 48 (2007).

36-91-21. Competitive award requirements.

Statute text

(a) It shall be unlawful to let out any public works construction contracts subject to the requirements of this chapter without complying with the competitive award requirements contained in this Code section. Any contractor who performs any work of the kind in any other manner and who knows that the public works construction contract was let out without complying with the notice and competitive award requirements of this chapter shall not be entitled to receive any payment for such work.

(b) Any competitive sealed bidding process shall comply with the following requirements:

(1) The governmental entity shall publicly advertise an invitation for bids;

(2) Bidders shall submit sealed bids based on the criteria set forth in such invitation;

(3) The governmental entity shall open the bids publicly and evaluate such bids without discussions with the bidders; and

(4) The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible and responsive bidder whose bid meets the requirements and criteria set forth in the invitation for bids; provided, however, that if the bid from the lowest responsible and responsive bidder exceeds the funds budgeted for the public works construction contract, the governmental entity may negotiate with such apparent low bidder to obtain a contract price within the budgeted amount. Such negotiations may include changes in the scope of work and other bid requirements.

(c) (1) In making any competitive sealed proposal, a governmental entity shall:

(A) Publicly advertise a request for proposals, which request shall include conceptual program information in the request for proposals describing the requested services in a level of detail appropriate to the project delivery method selected for the project, as well as the relative importance of the evaluation factors;

(B) Open all proposals received at the time and place designated in the request for proposals so as to avoid disclosure of contents to competing offerors during the process of negotiations; and

(C) Make an award to the responsible and responsive offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the governmental entity, taking into consideration the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. The evaluation factors shall be the basis on which the award decision is made. The contract file shall indicate the basis on which the award is made.

(2) As set forth in the request for proposals, offerors submitting proposals may be afforded an opportunity for discussion, negotiation, and revision of proposals. Discussions, negotiations, and revisions may be permitted after submission of proposals and prior to award for the purpose of obtaining best and final offers. In accordance with the request for proposals, all responsible offerors found by the governmental entity to have submitted proposals reasonably susceptible of being selected for award shall be given an opportunity to participate in such discussions, negotiations, and revisions. During the process of discussion, negotiation, and revision, the governmental entity shall not disclose the contents of proposals to competing offerors.

(d) Whenever a public works construction contract for any governmental entity subject to the requirements of this chapter is to be let out by competitive sealed bid or proposal, no person, by himself or herself or otherwise, shall prevent or attempt to prevent competition in such bidding or proposals by any means whatever. No person who desires to procure such work for himself or herself or for another shall prevent or endeavor to prevent anyone from making a bid or proposal therefor by any means whatever, nor shall such person so desiring the work cause or induce another to withdraw a bid or proposal for the work.

(e) Before commencing the work, any person who procures such public work by bidding or proposal shall make an oath in writing that he or she has not directly or indirectly violated subsection (d) of this Code section. The oath shall be filed by the officer whose duty it is to make the payment. If the contractor is a partnership, all of the partners and any officer, agent, or other person who may have represented or acted for them in bidding for or procuring the contract shall also make the oath. If the contractor is a corporation, all officers, agents, or other persons who may have acted for or represented the corporation in bidding for or procuring the contract shall make the oath. If such oath is false, the contract shall be void, and all sums paid by the governmental entity on the contract may be recovered by appropriate action.

(f) (1) Unless otherwise required by law, no governmental entity that contracts for public works construction shall in its bid documents, specifications, project agreements, or other controlling documents for a public works construction contract:

(A) Require or prohibit bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers to enter into or adhere to prehire agreements, project labor agreements, collective bargaining agreements, or any other agreement with one or more labor organizations on the same or other related construction projects; or

(B) Discriminate against, or treat differently, bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers for becoming or refusing to become or remain signatories or otherwise to adhere to agreements with one or more labor organizations on the same or other related construction projects.

(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit bidders, offerors, contractors, subcontractors, or material suppliers from voluntarily entering into agreements described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(3) The head of a governmental entity may exempt a particular public works construction contract from the requirements of any or all of the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection if the governmental entity finds, after public notice and a hearing, that special circumstances require an exemption to avert an imminent threat to public health or safety. A finding of special circumstance under this paragraph shall not be based on the possibility or presence of a labor dispute concerning the use of contractors or subcontractors who are nonsignatories to, or otherwise do not adhere to, agreements with one or more labor organizations or concerning employees on the particular project who are not members of or affiliated with a labor organization.

(g) If any member of a governmental entity lets out any public works construction contract subject to the requirements of this article and receives, takes, or contracts to receive or take, either directly or indirectly, any part of the pay or profit arising out of any such contract, he or she shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(h) No public works construction contract with a governing authority shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor shall comply with all bonding requirements of this chapter. No such contract shall be valid if any governmental entity lets out any public works construction contract subject to the requirements of this chapter without complying with the requirements of this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12; Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 5/SB 179.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on construction law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 59 (2008). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions under former O.C.G.A. § 36-82-102 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Applicability. - Since the highest bid for a town's construction project was less than $100,000.00, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-21 did not apply; also, while the winning bid was higher than another contractor's bid, the winning bid included more extensive work, consistent with the town's request and need; the awarding of the contract to the contractor's competitor was not improper. Griffin Bros., Inc. v. Town of Alto, 280 Ga. App. 176, 633 S.E.2d 589 (2006).

Mandamus. - Based on the Georgia legislature's explicitly stated intention in the Georgia Local Government Public Works Construction Law, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-1 et seq., that local laws and ordinances controlled the manner of the city's execution of and entry into contracts, a contractor was not entitled to a writ of mandamus requiring the city to execute a contract in the contractor's favor, as neither the mayor nor the city council exercised their discretionary authority to approve any award that might or might not have resulted from the competitive sealed proposals process. Duty Free Air & Ship Supply Co./Franklin Wilson Airport Concession, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 282 Ga. 173, 646 S.E.2d 48 (2007).

Liability when payment bond not obtained. - Former O.C.G.A. § 36-82-102 provided that if a payment bond was not obtained, then the Atlanta Housing Authority should be liable to subcontractors who furnish labor, supplies, materials, or equipment to the contractor for any loss resulting to the subcontractor. B & B Elec. Supply Co. v. H.J. Russell Constr. Co., 166 Ga. App. 499, 304 S.E.2d 544 (1983) (decided under former O.C.G.A. § 36-82-102).

School board acted within the board's authority. - Trial court properly relied solely on the court's determination that an unsuccessful bidding contractor would be unlikely to prevail on the merits of the contractor's suit in denying the contractor's petition for an interlocutory injunction and vacation of the court's temporary restraining order as: (1) a school board acted within the board's powers in accepting, albeit late, the lowest bidder's list of subcontractors; and (2) the board was authorized to find that the bid provision requiring that a list of subcontractors be provided with a bid was immaterial and could be waived. R. D. Brown Contrs., Inc. v. Bd. of Educ. of Columbia County, 280 Ga. 210, 626 S.E.2d 471 (2006).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Fingerprinting of offenders not required. - Violation of O.C.G.A. § 36-91-21(f) (see now (g)) is not an offense designated as one that requires fingerprinting. 2000 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2000-11.

36-91-22. Exceptions; use of inmate labor; emergency situations.

Statute text

(a) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects, when the same can be performed at a cost of less than $100,000.00. Public works construction projects shall not be subdivided in an effort to evade the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Any governmental entity having a correctional institution shall have the power and authority to purchase material for and use inmate labor in performing public works construction projects; and in such cases, this chapter shall not apply. Any governmental entity may contract with a governmental entity having a correctional institution for the use of inmate labor from such institution and use the inmates in the performance of any public works construction project; and in such cases, this chapter shall not apply.

(c) In the event that the labor used or to be used in a public works construction project is furnished at no expense by the state or federal government or any agency thereof, the governing authority shall have the power and authority to purchase material for such public works construction project and use the labor furnished free to the governmental entity; and in such case, this chapter shall not apply.

(d) Where a public works construction contract involves the expenditure of federal assistance or funds, the receipt of which is conditioned upon compliance with federal laws or regulations regarding the procedures for awarding public works construction contracts, a governmental entity shall comply with such federal requirements and shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this chapter that differ from the federal requirements. The governmental entity shall provide notice that federal procedures exist for the award of such contracts in the advertisement required by subsection (b) of Code Section 36-91-20. The availability and location of such federal requirements shall be provided to any person requesting such information.

(e) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects necessitated by an emergency; provided, however, that the nature of the emergency shall be described in the minutes of the governing authority. Any contract let by a county pursuant to this subsection shall be ratified, as soon as practicable, on the minutes of the governing authority, and the nature of the emergency shall be described therein.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 4 of Title 32, the requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects subject to the requirements of Chapter 4 of Title 32.

(g) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects or any portion of a public works construction project self-performed by a governmental entity. If the governmental entity contracts with a private person or entity for a portion of such project, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any such contract estimated to exceed $100,000.00.

(h) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to sole source public works construction contracts.

(i) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to hospital authorities; provided, however, that a public works construction contract entered into by a hospital authority shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter if, in connection with such contract, the hospital authority either:

(1) Incurs indebtedness and secures such indebtedness by pledging amounts to be received by such authority from one or more counties or municipalities through an intergovernmental contract entered into in accordance with Code Section 31-7-85; or

(2) Receives funds from the state or one or more counties or municipalities for the purpose of financing a public works construction project, which moneys are not for reimbursement of health services provided.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-22, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on construction law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 55 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 59 (2008). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008). For annual survey of construction law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 23 (2015).

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Bidding requirements for school capital outlay projects, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, School Facilities and Capital Outlay Management, Sec. 160-5-4-.18.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Payment bond not required. - City was not required to obtain a payment bond in compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-91-90 because the requirement did not apply to emergency projects, O.C.G.A. § 36-91-22(e); the city's description in the city's minutes of the "emergency replacement of a 10-inch sanitary sewer main on Embassy Drive" was sufficient to describe the nature of the emergency. City of College Park v. Sekisui SPR Ams., LLC, 331 Ga. App. 404, 771 S.E.2d 101 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1141, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 471 (Ga. 2015).

36-91-23. Prohibition of disqualification of otherwise qualified bidder from bid or proposal or prequalification based upon lack of previous experience; conditions.

Statute text

In awarding contracts based upon sealed competitive bids or sealed competitive proposals, no responsible bidder shall be disqualified from a bid or proposal or denied prequalification based upon:

(1) A lack of previous experience with a job of the size for which the bid or proposal is being sought if:

(A) The bid or proposal is not more than 30 percent greater in scope or cost from the responsible bidder's previous experience in jobs;

(B) The responsible bidder has experience in performing the work for which bids or proposals are sought; and

(C) The responsible bidder is capable of being bonded by a surety which meets the qualifications of the bid documents for a bid bond, a performance bond, and a payment bond as required for the scope of the work for which the bid or proposal is being sought; or

(2) A lack of previous experience with the construction delivery method to be used for the job for which the bid or proposal is being sought.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-23, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 126, § 2/SB 168; Ga. L. 2018, p. 343, § 2/HB 899.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective May 3, 2018, in the introductory paragraph, substituted "based upon: (1) A lack" for "based upon a lack" in the middle; redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (3) as present subparagraphs (1)(A) through (1)(C), respectively; added "; or" at the end of subparagraph (1)(C); and added paragraph (2).

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Bidding requirements for school capital outlay projects, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, School Facilities and Capital Outlay Management, Sec. 160-5-4-.18.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, Code Section 36-91-23, as enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 6/SB 179, was redesignated as Code Section 36-91-24.

36-91-24. Liquidated damages and other incentive provisions for project completion.

Statute text

Public works construction contracts may include both liquidated damages provisions for late construction project completion and incentive provisions for early construction project completion when the project schedule is deemed to have value. The terms of the liquidated damages provisions and the incentive provisions shall be established in advance as a part of the construction contract and included within the terms of the bid or proposal.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-24, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 6/SB 179.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, Code Section 36-91-23, as enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 6/SB 179, was redesignated as Code Section 36-91-24.

——————————

ARTICLE 3

BONDS

——————————

PART 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-91-40. Approval and filing of bonds with treasurer.

Statute text

(a)(1) Any bid bond, performance bond, payment bond, or security deposit required for a public works construction contract shall be approved and filed with the treasurer or the person performing the duties usually performed by a treasurer of the obligee named therein. At the option of the governmental entity, if the surety named in the bond is other than a surety company authorized by law to do business in this state pursuant to a current certificate of authority to transact surety business by the Commissioner of Insurance, such bond shall not be approved and filed unless such surety is on the United States Department of Treasury's list of approved bond sureties.

(2) Any bid bond, performance bond, or payment bond required by this Code section shall be approved as to form and as to the solvency of the surety by an officer of the governmental entity negotiating the contract on behalf of the governmental entity. In the case of a bid bond, such approval shall be obtained prior to acceptance of the bid or proposal. In the case of payment bonds and performance bonds, such approval shall be obtained prior to the execution of the contract.

(b) Whenever, in the judgment of the obligee:

(1) Any surety on a bid, performance, or payment bond has become insolvent;

(2) Any corporate surety is no longer certified or approved by the Commissioner of Insurance to do business in the state; or

(3) For any cause there are no longer proper or sufficient sureties on any or all of the bonds,

the obligee may require the contractor to strengthen any or all of the bonds or to furnish a new or additional bond or bonds within ten days. Thereupon, if so ordered by the obligee, all work on the contract shall cease unless such new or additional bond or bonds are furnished. If such bond or bonds are not furnished within such time, the obligee may terminate the contract and complete the same as the agent of and at the expense of the contractor and his or her sureties.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-40, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Approval of payment bonds. - When the general contractor failed to pay the subcontractor for the subcontractor's work on a city project and the surety was insolvent, and the subcontractor sued the general contractor and the city for the subcontractor's work, the trial court properly granted summary judgment in favor of the city because the city complied with the payment bond requirements, and the subcontractor was limited to the exclusive remedy set forth in Georgia's payment bond statutes, O.C.G.A. §§ 36-91-90 and 36-91-91. J. Squared Plumbing Company, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 337 Ga. App. 229, 786 S.E.2d 894 (2016).

36-91-41. No bid bond required under certain circumstances.

Statute text

When a governmental entity invites competitive sealed proposals for a public works construction project and the request for proposals for such project states that price or project cost will not be a selection or evaluation factor, no bid bond shall be required unless the governmental entity provides for a bid bond in the request for proposals and specifies the amount of such bond.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 7/SB 179.)

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Bidding requirements for school capital outlay projects, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, School Facilities and Capital Outlay Management, Sec. 160-5-4-.18.

Editor's notes. - Former Code Section 36-91-41 was redesignated as Code Section 36-91-50 by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001.

36-91-42 through 36-91-45. Redesignated.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Sections 36-91-41 through 36-91-45 as present Code Sections 36-91-50 through 36-91-54, respectively, and designated those Code sections as Part 2 of Article 3.

——————————

PART 2

BID BONDS

36-91-50. Projects requiring bid bonds; revocation of bids; surety.

Statute text

(a) Bid bonds shall be required for all public works construction contracts subject to the requirements of this article with estimated bids or proposals over $100,000.00; provided, however, that a governmental entity may require a bid bond for projects with estimated bids or proposals of $100,000.00 or less.

(b) In the case of competitive sealed bids, except as provided in Code Sections 36-91-52 and 36-91-53, a bid may not be revoked or withdrawn until 60 days after the time set by the governmental entity for opening of bids. Upon expiration of this time period, the bid will cease to be valid, unless the bidder provides written notice to the governmental entity prior to the scheduled expiration date that the bid will be extended for a time period specified by the governmental entity.

(c) In the case of competitive sealed proposals, the governmental entity shall advise offerors in the request for proposals of the number of days that offerors will be required to honor their proposals; provided, however, that if an offeror is not selected within 60 days of opening the proposals, any offeror that is determined by the governmental entity to be unlikely of being selected for contract award shall be released from his or her proposal.
